District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.07

Eligibility.

(a)

An employee is eligible to participate in the deferred compensation plan under § 1-626.05(2) upon commencement of employment with the District.

(b)

An employee is eligible to participate in the defined contribution plan under § 1-626.05(3) upon the completion of 1 year of employment with the District.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2607
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(g), 34 DCR 5079
1981 Ed., § 1-627.7.